Massachusetts, session 194th, H5443.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 4O the
following section:-
Section 4P. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Authorized entity”, any entity or organization at which allergens capable of causing
anaphylaxis may be present, including, but not limited to, restaurants, recreation camps, youth
sports leagues, amusement parks, colleges, universities and sports arenas.
“Epinephrine autoinjector”, a single-use device used for the automatic injection of a
premeasured dose of epinephrine into the human body.
(b) An authorized entity may, subject to the requirements of subsections (c) through (h),
inclusive, acquire and maintain a supply of epinephrine autoinjectors from a wholesaler
approved by the department.
of 3

(c) The authorized entity shall submit proof of training of an employee or agent to the
department and receive approval from the department for the acquisition of epinephrine
autoinjectors.
(d) An employee or agent of an authorized entity shall complete an anaphylaxis training
program approved by the department prior to providing or administering an epinephrine
autoinjector made available by an authorized entity. The training shall be conducted by a
nationally recognized organization experienced in training laypersons in emergency health
treatment or by an entity or individual approved by the department.
(e) An authorized entity shall store epinephrine autoinjectors in a location readily
accessible in an emergency and in accordance with the epinephrine autoinjector’s instructions for
use. An authorized entity shall designate employees or agents who have completed the training
required by subsection (d) to be responsible for the storage, maintenance and general oversight
of epinephrine autoinjectors.
(f) An employee or agent of an authorized entity who has completed the training required
by subsection (d) may, on the premises of or in connection with the authorized entity, use
epinephrine autoinjectors to provide or administer epinephrine to any individual who the
employee or agent believes in good faith is experiencing anaphylaxis, regardless of whether the
individual has a prescription for an epinephrine autoinjector or has previously been diagnosed
with an allergy.
(g) An authorized entity and its trained employees and agents shall not be liable for any
injuries or related damages that result from the administration or self-administration of an
epinephrine autoinjector, the failure to administer or provide an epinephrine autoinjector or any
of 3

other act or omission taken pursuant to this section; provided, that immunity shall not apply to
acts or omissions constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.
(h)(1) An authorized entity that possesses and makes available epinephrine autoinjectors
shall submit to the department, on a form developed by the department, a report of each incident
on the authorized entity’s premises that involves the administration of the authorized entity’s
epinephrine autoinjector.
(2) Annually, not later than January 1, the department shall publish a report to its website
that summarizes and analyzes all reports submitted pursuant to paragraph (1); provided, that the
department’s report shall not include personally identifiable information.
(i) The department shall promulgate guidance or regulations to carry out this section.
of 3